b/hyph_la_VA.dic
g2n
b2h
c2h
d2h
f2h
g2h
h2h
j2h
k2h
l2h
m2h
n2h
p2h
q2h
r2h
s2h
t2h
v2h
w2h
x2h
z2h
q2u
s2ci
s2cy
s2ce
s2cæ

2b1b2
2b1c2
2b1d2
2b1f2
2b1g2
2b1j2
2b1k2
2b1l2
2b1m2
2b1n2
2b1p2
2b1q2
2b1r2
2b1s2
2b1t2
2b1v2
2b1w2
2b1x2
2b1z2
2c1b2
2c1c2
2c1d2
2c1f2
2c1g2
2c1j2
2c1k2
2c1l2
2c1m2
2c1n2
2c1p2
2c1q2
2c1r2
2c1s2
2c1t2
2c1v2
2c1w2
2c1x2
2c1z2
2d1b2
2d1c2
2d1d2
2d1f2
2d1g2
2d1j2
2d1k2
2d1l2
2d1m2
2d1n2
2d1p2
2d1q2
2d1r2
2d1s2
2d1t2
2d1v2
2d1w2
2d1x2
2d1z2
2f1b2
2f1c2
2f1d2
2f1f2
2f1g2
2f1j2
2f1k2
2f1l2
2f1m2
2f1n2
2f1p2
2f1q2
2f1r2
2f1s2
2f1t2
2f1v2
2f1w2
2f1x2
2f1z2
2g1b2
2g1c2
2g1d2
2g1f2
2g1g2
2g1j2
2g1k2
2g1l2
2g1m2
2g1n2
2g1p2
2g1q2
2g1r2
2g1s2
2g1t2
2g1v2
2g1w2
2g1x2
2g1z2
2h1b2
2h1c2
2h1d2
2h1f2
2h1g2
2h1j2
2h1k2
2h1l2
2h1m2
2h1n2
2h1p2
2h1q2
2h1r2
2h1s2
2h1t2
2h1v2
2h1w2
2h1x2
2h1z2
2j1b2
2j1c2
2j1d2
2j1f2
2j1g2
2j1j2
2j1k2
2j1l2
2j1m2
2j1n2
2j1p2
2j1q2
2j1r2
2j1s2
2j1t2
2j1v2
2j1w2
2j1x2
2j1z2
2k1b2
2k1c2
2k1d2
2k1f2
2k1g2
2k1j2
2k1k2
2k1l2
2k1m2
2k1n2
2k1p2
2k1q2
2k1r2
2k1s2
2k1t2
2k1v2
2k1w2
2k1x2
2k1z2
2l1b2
2l1c2
2l1d2
2l1f2
2l1g2
2l1j2
2l1k2
2l1l2
2l1m2
2l1n2
2l1p2
2l1q2
2l1r2
2l1s2
2l1t2
2l1v2
2l1w2
2l1x2
2l1z2
2m1b2
2m1c2
2m1d2
2m1f2
2m1g2
2m1j2
2m1k2
2m1l2
2m1m2
2m1n2
2m1p2
2m1q2
2m1r2
2m1s2
2m1t2
2m1v2
2m1w2
2m1x2
2m1z2
2n1b2
2n1c2
2n1d2
2n1f2
2n1g2
2n1j2
2n1k2
2n1l2
2n1m2
2n1n2
2n1p2
2n1q2
2n1r2
2n1s2
2n1t2
2n1v2
2n1w2
2n1x2
2n1z2
2p1b2
2p1c2
2p1d2
2p1f2
2p1g2
2p1j2
2p1k2
2p1l2
2p1m2
2p1n2
2p1p2
2p1q2
2p1r2
2p1s2
2p1t2
2p1v2
2p1w2
2p1x2
2p1z2
2q1b2
2q1c2
2q1d2
2q1f2
2q1g2
2q1j2
2q1k2
2q1l2
2q1m2
2q1n2
2q1p2
2q1q2
2q1r2
2q1s2
2q1t2
2q1v2
2q1w2
2q1x2
2q1z2
2r1b2
2r1c2
2r1d2
2r1f2
2r1g2
2r1j2
2r1k2
2r1l2
2r1m2
2r1n2
2r1p2
2r1q2
2r1r2
2r1s2
2r1t2
2r1v2
2r1w2
2r1x2
2r1z2
2s1b2
2s1c2
2s1d2
2s1f2
2s1g2
2s1j2
2s1k2
2s1l2
2s1m2
2s1n2
2s1p2
2s1q2
2s1r2
2s1s2
2s1t2
2s1v2
2s1w2
2s1x2
2s1z2
2t1b2
2t1c2
2t1d2
2t1f2
2t1g2
2t1j2
2t1k2
2t1l2
2t1m2
2t1n2
2t1p2
2t1q2
2t1r2
2t1s2
2t1t2
2t1v2
2t1w2
2t1x2
2t1z2
2v1b2
2v1c2
2v1d2
2v1f2
2v1g2
2v1j2
2v1k2
2v1l2
2v1m2
2v1n2
2v1p2
2v1q2
2v1r2
2v1s2
2v1t2
2v1v2
2v1w2
2v1x2
2v1z2
2w1b2
2w1c2
2w1d2
2w1f2
2w1g2
2w1j2
2w1k2
2w1l2
2w1m2
2w1n2
2w1p2
2w1q2
2w1r2
2w1s2
2w1t2
2w1v2
2w1w2
2w1x2
2w1z2
2x1b2
2x1c2
2x1d2
2x1f2
2x1g2
2x1j2
2x1k2
2x1l2
2x1m2
2x1n2
2x1p2
2x1q2
2x1r2
2x1s2
2x1t2
2x1v2
2x1w2
2x1x2
2x1z2
2z1b2
2z1c2
2z1d2
2z1f2
2z1g2
2z1j2
2z1k2
2z1l2
2z1m2
2z1n2
2z1p2
2z1q2
2z1r2
2z1s2
2z1t2
2z1v2
2z1w2
2z1x2
2z1z2

sta3
ste3
sti3
sto3
stu3
stá3
sté3
stí3
stó3
stú3
ta2
te2
ti2
to2
tu2
tá2
té2
tí2
tó2
tú2
ba1
be1
bi1
bo1
bu1
by1
bá1
bé1
bí1
bó1
bú1
bæ1
ca1
ce1
ci1
co1
cu1
cy1
cá1
cé1
cí1
có1
cú1
cæ1
da1
de1
di1
do1
du1
dy1
dá1
dé1
dí1
dó1
dú1
dæ1
fa1
fe1
fi1
fo1
fu1
fy1
fá1
fé1
fí1
fó1
fú1
fæ1
ga1
ge1
gi1
go1
gu1
gy1
gá1
gé1
gí1
gó1
gú1
gæ1
ha1
he1
hi1
ho1
hu1
hy1
há1
hé1
hí1
hó1
hú1
hæ1
ja1
je1
ji1
jo1
ju1
jy1
já1
jé1
jí1
jó1
jú1
jæ1
ka1
ke1
ki1
ko1
ku1
ky1
ká1
ké1
kí1
kó1
kú1
kæ1
la1
le1
li1
lo1
lu1
ly1
lá1
lé1
lí1
ló1
lú1
læ1
ma1
me1
mi1
mo1
mu1
my1
má1
mé1
mí1
mó1
mú1
mæ1
na1
ne1
ni1
no1
nu1
ny1
ná1
né1
ní1
nó1
nú1
næ1
pa1
pe1
pi1
po1
pu1
py1
pá1
pé1
pí1
pó1
pú1
pæ1
qa1
qe1
qi1
qo1
qu1
qy1
qá1
qé1
qí1
qó1
qú1
qæ1
ra1
re1
ri1
ro1
ru1
ry1
rá1
ré1
rí1
ró1
rú1
ræ1
sa1
se1
si1
so1
su1
sy1
sá1
sé1
sí1
só1
sú1
sæ1
tæ1
va1
ve1
vi1
vo1
vu1
vy1
vá1
vé1
ví1
vó1
vú1
væ1
wa1
we1
wi1
wo1
wu1
wy1
wá1
wé1
wí1
wó1
wú1
wæ1
xa1
xe1
xi1
xo1
xu1
xy1
xá1
xé1
xí1
xó1
xú1
xæ1
za1
ze1
zi1
zo1
zu1
zy1
zá1
zé1
zí1
zó1
zú1
zæ1
